Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 19.5 City of Newport — Commercial Low-Speed Vehicles

31-19.5-1.
City of Newport — Commercial low-speed vehicles.

For the purposes of this chapter, a commercial low-speed vehicle means a self-propelled, electrically or gas-powered motor vehicle that: is designed to carry eight (8) or fewer persons; is designed to be, and is, operated at speeds of twenty-five (25) miles per hour or less; and conforms to the maximum safety equipment requirements as adopted in the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 500, Low-Speed vehicles (49 C.F.R. § 571.500). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a low-speed vehicle may be operated upon the roadways of the city of Newport as a commercial jitney service only if it meets the requirements of this section.

Each person operating a commercial low-speed vehicle on a roadway of the city of Newport shall possess a valid chauffeur’s license issued pursuant to §

31-10-1

and be at least twenty (20) years old.

Any person operating a commercial low-speed vehicle shall first obtain a certificate of necessity from the Rhode Island public utilities commission.

Every operator of a commercial low-speed vehicle shall maintain financial responsibility on the low-speed vehicle if the low-speed vehicle is to be operated upon the roadways of the city of Newport.

Every person operating a commercial low-speed vehicle shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all duties applicable to the driver of any motor vehicle except as to the special regulations in this section and except as to those provisions that, by their nature, can have no application.

The operator of a commercial low-speed vehicle shall observe all traffic laws and local ordinances regarding the rules of the road. A low-speed vehicle shall not be operated on a street or a highway with a posted speed limit greater than twenty-five (25) miles per hour. The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit a low-speed vehicle from crossing a street or highway with a posted speed limit greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour.

No person shall operate a commercial low-speed vehicle:

In any careless way as to endanger the person or property of another; or

While under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance. Low-speed vehicles shall be manufactured and comply with the standards of the National Traffic Safety Administration Standards for low-speed vehicles as set out in 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended.

A commercial low-speed vehicle shall only be operated during the hours of 6:00 a.m. through 12:00 a.m..

Safety inspections. Electrically powered commercial low-speed vehicles shall, where applicable, be subject to Rhode Island’s vehicle inspection program pursuant to chapter 38 of title 31 and emissions testing pursuant to chapter 47.1 of title 31. Upon registration and renewal of a low-speed vehicle’s registration, the owner shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that all lights, tires, seat belts, and other vehicle equipment are in good working condition.

Title and registration. The division of motor vehicles shall issue a title and jitney registration for a commercial low-speed vehicle upon submission of a certificate from the manufacturer that the low-speed vehicle meets the safety standards of the National Traffic Safety Administration Standards for low-speed vehicles as set out in 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 282, § 1.